South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S742.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-36-2120 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (85) baby formula and baby food, which include, but are not limited to, food purees, puffs, teether crackers, yogurt melts, puree pouches, and other food intended for sale for infants and children under thirty-six months of age. (86) baby clothes, which includes, but is not limited to, diapers, onesies, shirts, pants, hats, mittens, socks, shoes, and other items intended for sale for infants and children under thirty six months of age. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----